Wyoming, session 2025, HB0032.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 8-1-110 is created to read:
8-1-110. References to males and females; separate
accommodations for males and females; data reporting
requirements.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, with
respect to the application of a person's biological sex
under any law or rule and regulation in this state, the
following definitions and standards shall apply:
(i) A person's "sex" means the person's
biological sex, either male or female, at birth;
(ii) "Female" means a person who has, had, will
have or would have had, but for a congenital anomaly or
intentional or unintentional disruption, the reproductive
system that at some point produces, transports and utilizes
eggs for fertilization;
(iii) "Male" means a person who has, had, will
have or would have had, but for a congenital anomaly or
intentional or unintentional disruption, the reproductive
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0032
ENROLLED ACT NO. 73, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
system that at some point produces, transports and utilizes
sperm for fertilization;
(iv) The terms "woman" and "girl" refer to human
females, and the terms "man" and "boy" refer to human
males;
(v) "Mother" means a parent of the female sex;
(vi) "Father" means a parent of the male sex;
(vii) With respect to biological sex, the term
"equal" does not mean "same" or "identical";
(viii) With respect to biological sex, separate
accommodations are not inherently unequal; and
(ix) A person born with a medically recognized
condition of a disorder or difference in sex development
shall not be denied legal protections and accommodations
afforded under applicable law.
(b) The legislature finds that laws, rules and
regulations that distinguish between the sexes are subject
to intermediate constitutional scrutiny. Intermediate
constitutional scrutiny forbids unfair discrimination
against similarly situated male and female persons but
allows the law to distinguish between the sexes where such
distinctions are substantially related to important
governmental objectives.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, laws, rules and regulations that recognize or
enforce distinctions between the sexes with respect to
athletics, prisons or other detention facilities, domestic
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0032
ENROLLED ACT NO. 73, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
violence shelters, rape crisis centers, locker rooms,
restrooms and other areas where safety or privacy are
implicated and that result in separate accommodations
between the sexes are substantially related to the
important governmental objectives of protecting the health,
safety and privacy of persons in such circumstances.
(d) Any school district, or public school thereof,
and any state agency, department, office or other political
subdivision that collects vital statistics for the purpose
of complying with anti-discrimination laws or for the
purpose of gathering accurate public health, crime,
economic or other data shall, when identification by sex is
used, identify each person who is part of the collected
data set as either male or female consistent with the
persons sex at birth.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0032
ENROLLED ACT NO. 73, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4